District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.01

Repealed

Proceedings available under this chapter.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 301, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(1), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
This section is referenced in § 46-303.05.
1981 Ed., § 30-343.1.
D.C. Law 16-137 repealed subsec. (b); and in subsec. (c), substituted “initiate” for “commence”.
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 301 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).